Utah statutes.
77-10a-2.   Panel of judges -- Appointment -- Membership -- Ordering of
grand jury.
(1) (a)  The presiding officer of the Judicial Council shall appoint a panel
of five judges from the district courts of the state to hear in secret all
persons claiming information that would justify the calling of a grand jury.
The presiding officer may appoint senior status district court judges to the
panel.  The presiding officer shall designate one member of the panel as
supervising judge to serve at the pleasure of the presiding officer.  The
panel has the authority of the district court.
(b)  To ensure geographical diversity on the panel one judge shall be
appointed from the first or second district for a five-year term, one judge
shall be appointed from the third district for a four-year term, one judge
shall be appointed from the fourth district for a three-year term, one judge
shall be appointed from the fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth districts for a
two-year term, and one judge shall be appointed from the third district for a
one-year term.  Following the first term, all terms on the panel are for five
years.
(c)  The panel shall hold hearings in each judicial district at least once
every three years and may meet at any location within the state. Three members
of the panel constitute a quorum for the transaction of panel business.  The
panel shall act by the concurrence of a majority of members present and may
act through the supervising judge or managing judge.  The schedule for the
hearings shall be set by the panel and published by the Office of the Court
Administrator.  Persons appearing before the panel shall be placed under oath
and examined by the judges conducting the hearings.  Hearsay evidence may be
presented at the hearings only under the same provisions and limitations that
apply to preliminary hearings.
(2) (a)  If the panel finds good cause to believe a grand jury is necessary,
the panel shall make its findings in writing and may order a grand jury to be
summoned.
(b)  The panel may refer a matter to the attorney general, county attorney,
district attorney, or city attorney for investigation and prosecution.  The
referral shall contain as much of the information presented to the panel as
the panel determines relevant.  The attorney general, county attorney,
district attorney, or city attorney shall report to the panel the results of
any investigation and whether the matter will be prosecuted by a prosecutor's
information.  The report shall be filed with the panel within 120 days after
the referral unless the panel provides for a different amount of time.  If the
panel is not satisfied with the action of the attorney general, county
attorney, district attorney, or city attorney, the panel may order a grand
jury to be summoned.
(3)  When the attorney general, a county attorney, a district attorney, or a
special prosecutor appointed under Section 77-10a-12 certifies in writing to
the supervising judge that in his judgment a grand jury is necessary because
of criminal activity in the state, the  panel, upon a determination of good
cause, shall order a grand jury to be summoned.
(4)  The supervising judge may at the time the grand jury is summoned:
(a)  order that it be drawn from the state at large as provided in this
chapter or from any district within the state; and
(b)  retain authority to supervise the grand jury or delegate the supervision
of the grand jury to any judge of any district court within the state.
